Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.130

Cancellation of registration or application—Grounds.

If the director finds that any registrant or applicant for registration is no longer in existence or has ceased to do business as a broker-dealer, investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or salesperson, or is subject to an adjudication of mental incompetence or to the control of a committee, conservator, or guardian, or cannot be located after reasonable search, the director may by order cancel the registration or application.

[ 1994 c 256 s 12; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 9; 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 9; 1959 c 282 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.